District of Columbia statutes.
42-814

Petition for new trustee; causes; procedure; written agreement of parties.

(a)

In case of the refusal of any trustee named in a deed of trust to secure a debt to accept the trusts thereby created, or of his resignation of said trust after accepting the same, which is hereby allowed, or of his removal from the District of Columbia, or of his inability to act, or for any other good cause shown, it shall be lawful for any party interested in the execution of such trusts to apply to said court by petition, setting forth the appropriate facts and asking for the appointment of a new trustee in his place, and a like proceeding shall be had for the appointment of such trustee as in the case of the death of a trustee, as directed in §§ 42-811 and 42-819; provided, that any rule to show cause issued in such case shall be served upon the existing trustee, as provided in said sections.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision in a deed of trust to the contrary, whenever the grantors named in, and the persons secured by, the deed of trust (or their successors in interest) so desire, they may by written agreement executed and acknowledged in the same manner as an absolute deed substitute any trustee named in the deed of trust with a new trustee. No written instrument entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be effective as to any person not having actual notice thereof until a notice of the appointment of the new trustee signed, sealed, and acknowledged by the parties agreeing to the appointment of the new trustee shall be recorded among the land records in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1274, ch. 854, § 538
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 532, ch. 1329
Nov. 2, 1966, 80 Stat. 1100, Pub. L. 89-706, § 1(d)
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-803, § 42-811, § 42-819, and § 47-1349.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-714.
1973 Ed., § 45-614.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).